Utah statutes.
63E-1-302.   Review by committee required for creating an independent
entity.
(1)  If a government requestor proposes that the Legislature create an
independent entity, that government requestor shall request that the committee
review the proposal.
(2)  After receiving a request for review under Subsection (1), the chairs of
the committee:
(a)  shall schedule a meeting of the committee to review the proposal; and
(b)  may request information from executive and legislative branch entities
and officers concerning the proposal including:
(i)  whether or not the proposed independent entity should be exempt from any
state statute;
(ii)  the need for oversight of the proposed independent entity by an
executive branch agency;
(iii)  the need for and requirements of audits of the proposed independent
entity;
(iv)  the custody of the proposed independent entity's funds;
(v)  the legal representation of the proposed independent entity;
(vi)  whether or not the state should receive services from or provide
services to the proposed independent entity; and
(vii)  the legal liability, if any, to the state if the proposed independent
entity is created.
(3)  In requesting information from executive and legislative branch entities
or officers under Subsection (2), the committee should specifically consider
seeking information from:
(a)  the state auditor;
(b)  the state treasurer;
(c)  the attorney general;
(d)  the risk manager; and
(e)  the executive director of the Department of Administrative Services.
